Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB9.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act:
(1) "Developer" means one (1) or more persons or entities that petition a local
government for the establishment of a district under Section 2 of this Act, and
that are responsible for the development of residential property within a district;
(2) "Establishing ordinance" means an ordinance of a local government
establishing a district under Section 2 of this Act;
(3) "Infrastructure" means:
(a) The streets, roads, bridges, sidewalks, water, wastewater, natural gas,
electric, telecommunications, and storm water facilities required for the
development of residential property within a district, whether located within
or without the district, that benefit the properties within the district; and
(b) The land within the boundaries of the district required to be donated,
dedicated, or otherwise made available to a local government for public
purposes;
(4) "Infrastructure costs" means:
(a) All costs that may be capitalized under generally accepted accounting
principles for purchasing, constructing, installing, and equipping
infrastructure;
(b) The fees or costs imposed by a municipality or utility service provider:
1. Related to the construction or installation of infrastructure; or
2. As a condition to the delivery of utility services to properties within a
district; and
(c) The cost of any land required to be donated, dedicated, or otherwise made
Page 1 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
available to a governmental entity for public purposes, which land shall be
valued at either the developer's demonstrated cost or, if the value of the land
has subsequently been appraised, its appraised value, whichever is higher;
(5) "Initiating petition" means a petition submitted to a local government requesting
the establishment of a district under Section 2 of this Act;
(6) "Local government" means a city, county, consolidated local government, urban-
county government, charter county government, or unified local government that
establishes and operates a district under Sections 1 to 6 of this Act;
(7) "Owner" means the owner of record of a parcel of property within a district or
the owner's authorized representative;
(8) "Residential infrastructure development district" or "district" means an area
that:
(a) Is composed of five (5) or more acres of land;
(b) Requires a capital cost to complete development that is equal to or greater
than five million dollars ($5,000,000);
(c) Upon its complete development will have more than one-half (1/2) of its
space dedicated to residential housing; and
(d) Is established under Sections 1 to 6 of this Act; and
(9) "Special assessment" means a special charge levied by a local government on
property to finance infrastructure costs under Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A residential infrastructure development district shall be established as follows:
(a) The developer and each owner of property proposed to be included in a
district shall sign an initiating petition requesting the establishment of a
district, which shall be submitted to a local government. The initiating
petition shall set forth:
Page 2 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
1. The name and address of the developer;
2. The local government to be responsible for overseeing the district;
3. A map and description of the area to be included within the district;
4. A list of each parcel of property to be included within the district that
contains each parcel's mailing address;
5. A site development plan for the district showing the area in the district
that is anticipated to be used for residential housing;
6. A description of the infrastructure that the developer anticipates will
be necessary to complete the development and an estimated cost of that
infrastructure;
7. The cost that the developer anticipates is necessary to complete the
development;
8. The proposed rate of the special assessment to be imposed;
9. That the developer or owner of property to be included within the
district has received the approval set out in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, if applicable; and
10. A formal request that the local government establish the district;
(b) If a mortgage or lien encumbers a parcel of property to be included within
the district, the developer or owner of the property shall obtain a signed
approval from the mortgage holder or lien holder before the property may
be included in the district. If the mortgage holder or lien holder does not
grant the approval, the property shall not be included within the district;
(c) Upon receipt of the initiating petition a local government shall, within
ninety (90) days, approve or deny the petition. The decision to approve or
deny a petition is solely at the discretion of the local government. To
approve a petition a local government shall:
1. Determine whether the petition contains the information required in
Page 3 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
paragraph (a) of this subsection;
2. Conduct a public hearing concerning the proposed establishment of
the district, notice of which shall be provided in the usual method of
providing notice of a public meeting and shall also include mailed,
written notices to each property owner whose property is proposed to
be included in the district; and
3. Adopt an establishing ordinance that contains:
a. The name and address of the developer;
b. The local government responsible for overseeing the district;
c. A map and description of the area to be included within the
district;
d. A list of each parcel of property to be included within the district
that contains each parcel's mailing addresses;
e. A statement that the properties in the district may be subject to a
special assessment;
f. A description of the infrastructure that the local government has
authorized to be financed via a special assessment;
g. A description of the method of assessing and collecting special
assessments under Section 4 of this Act;
h. The time and manner in which the special assessment shall be
paid; and
i. The portion of the special assessment to be retained by the local
government for the payment of administrative expenses under
Section 4 of this Act; and
(d) The establishing ordinance may differ from the initiating petition, but the
local government shall endeavor to negotiate with the developer and the
owners of any property to be included within the district regarding
Page 4 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
differences between the initiating petition and the establishing ordinance
prior to its passage.
(2) A property owner that signs a petition pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section
shall not be permitted to remove the property owner's name from the petition.
(3) Each district established under Sections 1 to 6 of this Act shall be dissolved by the
local government immediately upon the payment and discharge of all outstanding
debt obligations incurred as a result of infrastructure costs for the district.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A local government shall have the power to issue bonds, notes, or other debt
obligations for the purpose of any of the following:
(a) Paying infrastructure costs identified in the establishing ordinance;
(b) Reimbursing the developer for the payment of prior infrastructure costs
identified in the establishing ordinance; or
(c) Refinancing those bonds, notes, or obligations consistent with applicable
law.
(2) A local government shall use revenue collected from special assessments levied
under Section 4 of this Act for the payment of any bond, note, or other obligation
issued pursuant to this section.
(3) The maximum term of any bonds, notes, or other debt obligations issued under
this section shall not exceed thirty (30) years from the date of first issuance.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Upon the adoption of an establishing ordinance, a local government is authorized
to levy special assessments against all properties located in a district. The revenue
collected from special assessments shall be applied to infrastructure costs
identified in the establishing ordinance and may be applied to administrative
Page 5 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
costs under subsection (4) of this section.
(2) The local government shall determine the total costs and expenses to be paid from
special assessments, and apportion those costs and expenses upon the various
properties located in the district in accordance with the benefits conferred upon
the properties. In determining the benefits to each property, the local government
may consider factors regarding the property, including:
(a) Frontage to infrastructure;
(b) Total area; and
(c) Proportion that the assessed value of each property has to the total property
in the district.
(3) A local government that levies a special assessment under this section shall
impose and collect the special assessment annually.
(4) A local government may provide that up to five percent (5%) of the revenue
collected from a special assessment may be used for its administrative expenses,
including overhead costs associated with the collection of the special assessment.
(5) A local government shall prepare an assessment roll that lists the address and
owner of each property in the district and the assessed value of the property, and
shall update the roll whenever property listed on the roll is subdivided or its value
is reassessed.
(6) If a property owner fails to pay a special assessment on or before the date
determined by the local government, interest of one percent (1%) per month and a
penalty of one percent (1%) per month shall be added to the assessment.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A special assessment, any interest accruing on the assessment, and the costs of
collection of the assessment under Section 4 of this Act constitute a lien on the
property upon which the assessment is levied. The lien shall be superior to a lien
Page 6 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
of any trust deed, mortgage, mechanic's lien, or other encumbrance, but shall not
be superior to any lien for the payment of taxes or a lien established pursuant to
KRS 65.8835.
(2) Amounts collected by a local government shall not be allocated to the payment of
a special assessment until all taxes, penalties, and interest relating to ad valorem
taxes imposed by any governmental entity have been paid in full.
(3) If any special assessment is or becomes delinquent and the property subject to the
assessment has been sold to the local government as a result of the delinquency,
redemption of that property is allowed upon payment, not later than one (1) year
after the date of sale, of the full amount of assessments due, plus interest and
penalties.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A residential infrastructure development district may be formed by two (2) or
more local governments acting jointly.
(2) Each local government acting jointly to establish a district shall enter into an
interlocal agreement in accordance with KRS 65.210 to 65.300 concerning the
district.
(3) Each local government acting jointly to establish a district shall follow the
procedures set out in Section 2 of this Act, but may satisfy the public hearing
requirement set out in subsection (1)(c)2. of Section 2 of this Act by conducting a
single joint public hearing.
(4) Prior to the completion of establishing ordinances, local governments acting
jointly shall determine which local government will be responsible for the
specified infrastructure costs and the collection of any special assessments
authorized under Section 4 of this Act. This information shall be provided in the
establishing ordinance and the interlocal agreement.
Page 7 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Approved project" means a project for which the developer has:
1. Filed an application under subsection (6) of this section;
2. Negotiated the terms of housing incentive payments with a local
government; and
3. Commenced a housing development within a district;
(b) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Economic Development;
(c) "Department" means the Department for Local Government;
(d) "Housing development district" or "district" means a contiguous
geographic area of not more than one thousand (1,000) acres, no more than
twenty percent (20%) of which may be land zoned for agricultural use upon
the adoption of an establishing ordinance, which may be within one (1) or
more cities or counties, defined and created for development or
revitalization purposes by an ordinance of a local government in which one
(1) or more projects are proposed to be located;
(e) "Local government" means a city, county, charter county government,
consolidated local government, urban-county government, or unified local
government;
(f) "New construction" means the planning, design, building, or any
combination of these, to erect a completely new structure never before
occupied within a district;
(g) "Program" means the Housing Incentive Payment Program provided for in
this section;
(h) "Project" means a housing development within a district that:
1. Contains at least fifteen (15) housing units, including multifamily and
Page 8 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
mixed-use housing; and
2. Meets the requirements set out in this section and any additional
requirements adopted by an ordinance of a local government;
(i) "Revitalization" means the planning or replanning, design or redesign,
acquisition, clearance, development, disposal, rehabilitation, historic
preservation, or any combination of these, of a structure within a district
and the preparation and use of the structure for residential purposes; and
(j) "Taxing authority" means a school district or a special purpose
governmental entity having ad valorem taxing authority and operating
within the jurisdiction of a local government that has established a district.
(2) (a) A local government may establish a housing development district by:
1. Adopting an ordinance containing:
a. A map and description of the area to be included within the
district;
b. A description of the process by which a developer may apply to
construct housing within the district;
c. A statement regarding whether development within the district
is:
i. Exempt from permitting or review by the planning unit; or
ii. Subject to an alternative process for permitting or review
except in no instance shall an alternative process be more
stringent than the procedure utilized outside of the district
for similar developments; and
d. Any additional requirements or qualifications that developers
must meet to be eligible for participation in the program;
2. Notifying the cabinet and the department that a district has been
created and transmitting information as required in subsection (10) of
Page 9 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
this section; and
3. Providing notice by certified mail to each owner of record of property
proposed to be included within the district that:
a. The property is proposed to be included within the district; and
b. The owner may exclude the property from the district as set out
in paragraph (c)1. of this subsection.
(b) A developer may petition a local government to establish a district.
(c) A local government shall:
1. Exclude a parcel of property from a proposed district if the local
government receives a written request from a property owner seeking
exclusion within thirty (30) days of the adoption of an ordinance
under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
2. Amend the map and description of the district accordingly.
(3) (a) If a local government chooses to utilize the exemption to planning and
zoning or alternative process under subsection (2)(a)1.c. of this section, the
local government shall conduct a public hearing regarding the exemption
or alternative process, and a separate vote of the legislative body of the local
government shall be required to adopt the exemption or alternative process.
(b) The meeting shall be held solely for this purpose, and no other business
shall be conducted at the meeting.
(4) (a) Local governments may act jointly, via an interlocal agreement in
accordance with KRS 65.210 to 65.300, to establish a district.
(b) The interlocal agreement shall contain the information set out in subsection
(2) of this section, and each participating local government shall be
required to adopt an ordinance as set out in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) (a) In addition to a local government, any taxing authority may elect to
participate in the program by its board enacting a resolution declaring its
Page 10 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
election to participate.
(b) If a taxing authority elects to participate under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the taxing authority shall proceed to negotiate with the
developer as described in subsection (6)(c) of this section.
(6) (a) Following the creation of a district, a local government may accept
applications from developers for a project.
(b) A local government shall have the sole discretion to approve or deny an
application, but a local government shall not approve a project unless it
determines that the project will not commence unless the developer receives
the housing incentive payment set out in subsection (7) of this section.
(c) If a local government approves an application, it shall:
1. Negotiate with the developer to:
a. Determine a percentage of the property tax actually paid in any
year that will be used to calculate the housing incentive payment
described in subsection (7) of this section;
b. Set the duration of the housing incentive payments, not to exceed
the maximum terms set out in subsection (7) of this section;
c. Define when the project shall be considered to have commenced
for the purposes set out in subsection (7) of this section; and
d. Establish the timing for the housing incentive payments; and
2. After agreeing to the terms set out in subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph, transmit the application along with a document setting out
those terms to the cabinet and the department.
(d) An application under this subsection shall not be required for a developer
seeking to develop housing within a district if that developer is not seeking
to participate in the program. An application shall only be required if a
developer is seeking to participate in the program. This section shall not be
Page 11 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
construed to permit a local government to prohibit a developer from
developing housing within the district that would otherwise be permissible
outside of the district or in the absence of the existence of a district.
(7) A Housing Incentive Payment Program shall be administered as follows:
(a) Participating local governments and participating taxing authorities shall
each award a housing incentive payment to a developer of an approved
project on an annual basis for a period of up to:
1. Seven (7) years for a project involving new construction; or
2. Fifteen (15) years for a project solely involving revitalization of
structures;
beginning six (6) months from the commencement of the project as
determined under subsection (6)(c)1.c. of this section;
(b) The annual housing incentive payment from each participating local
government and taxing authority shall be calculated by first determining the
total property tax that was actually paid in the preceding year to each
participating local government and taxing authority for each parcel of
property included in an approved project which has been issued a certificate
of occupancy, and applying the percentage agreed to by the participating
local governments, other taxing authorities if applicable, and the developer
as set out in subparagraph (6)(c)1. of this section; and
(c) Any private or nonprofit entity may contribute money to a local government
to award as additional housing incentive payment amounts for a project
within a district.
(8) A local area development district shall, upon the request of a local government,
assist with the establishment of a district under this section and with the
administration of a program under subsection (7) of this section.
(9) (a) The cabinet shall develop and implement strategies and programs to
Page 12 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
promote awareness of a program operating under this section among
businesses and employers it provides services to or conducts business with.
(b) When the cabinet engages with a company regarding participation in any
incentive or funding program administered by the cabinet, including when
it initially communicates with, receives an application from, and approves
funding to, any company, it shall provide to the company information
regarding:
1. The program set out in this section, including a list of local
governments that have established districts and implemented programs
under this section; and
2. The Certified Child Care Community Designation Program under
KRS 199.891, including a list of communities that have obtained that
designation.
(c) The cabinet shall prepare and post a report to the website required in KRS
154.12-2035, on November 1 of each year, that contains a list of the local
governments that have established districts and implemented programs
under this section and a list of communities that have obtained the certified
child care community designation under KRS 199.891, and information
regarding the cabinet's engagement with companies including the total
number of contacts made under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(10) (a) When a local government establishes a district, and no later than each
September 1 thereafter, the local government shall transmit information to
the cabinet and the department including:
1. Whether the district has been established jointly with any other local
government, and if so which other local governments;
2. A map and description of the area included in the district;
3. The density of housing units per acre in the district;
Page 13 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
4. The total number of developers that have applied for participation in
the program including the number approved and denied;
5. The total number of projects in the program;
6. For each approved project:
a. The name of the developer of the approved project;
b. The total assessed value of property that is a part of the approved
project;
c. The total number of housing units that have been constructed in
connection with the approved project;
d. The total amount of housing incentive payments that have been
made in connection with the approved project;
e. The duration of the housing incentive payments that the local
government has agreed to make to the developer;
f. The identity of any other taxing authority that has participated in
the approved project and the total amount of housing incentive
payments issued from each taxing authority; and
g. The identity of any private or nonprofit entities that have
participated in the approved project and the total amount of
housing incentive payments from each entity;
7. A running total of the amount of funds all participating local
governments have expended on all approved projects within the
district;
8. A running total of the number of housing units constructed in the
district by a developer that has received housing incentive payments;
and
9. Whether the local government has obtained a certified child care
community designation.
Page 14 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 9/GA
(b) Beginning November 1, 2027, the department shall submit an annual report
to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue summarizing the information it
has received from local governments under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(c) The department may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to carry out this subsection, including the creation
of a standardized form to be used by local governments to submit
information.
(d) A local government shall not be required to submit any further information
on an approved project following the disbursement of the final housing
incentive payment associated with that project.
(11) This section shall not be construed to prohibit or preempt a local government
from adopting any other ordinance or regulation or establishing any other
program, including an incentive program, concerning housing development.
Page 15 of 15
SB000910.100 - 1742 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:56 PM GA